Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Regulation of Smoking in Public Buildings

§ 29-5-160.
Short title.

Sections 29-5-160 through 29-5-163 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Clean Indoor Air Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 470, § 1 eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 29-5-161.
Smoking prohibited in government and university or college classroom buildings; exceptions.

As used in this section:

“Smoke” or “smoking” means inhaling, exhaling, burning, carrying or otherwise possessing any lighted cigarette, cigar, pipe or any other object or device of any form that contains lighted tobacco.

“Government building” means all state buildings identified in Section 29-5-2(a)(i) through (iv), the Public Employees’ Retirement System Building and any other facility in the state that is owned or leased by the State of Mississippi or any agency, department or institution of the state and that is used for housing state employees during the time of performance of their regular duties for the state; any building owned, rented, leased, occupied or operated by the state, including the legislative, executive and judicial branches of state government; any county, municipality or any other political subdivision of the state; any public authority, commission, agency or public benefit corporation; or any other separate corporate instrumentality or unit of state or local government. If only part of a facility is leased by the state or an agency, department or institution of the state, or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state, only the leased part of the facility will be considered to be a government building for the purposes of this definition. The term “government building” shall not include any building owned or leased by the state institutions of higher learning or the public community and junior colleges or any space in a government building used by law enforcement officers.

“University or college classroom building” means any building used by the state institutions of higher learning or the public community and junior colleges exclusively for student instructional purposes. The term includes classrooms, auditoriums, theaters, laboratories, hallways and restrooms. Smoking policies applicable in the private offices of faculty and staff and other “smoking permitted” space may be determined by each academic and administrative department.

No person shall smoke in any government building, except as follows: The State Veterans Affairs Board may designate smoking areas in the state veterans homes operated by the board in which smoking will be permitted.

No person shall smoke in any university or college classroom building.

The person, agency or entity having jurisdiction or supervision over a government building or university/college classroom building shall not allow smoking in the government or university/college classroom building, except in designated smoking areas as authorized in subsection (2) of this section, and shall use reasonable efforts to prevent smoking in such building, including, but not limited to, the following:

Posting appropriate signs informing employees, invitees, guests and other persons that smoking is prohibited in the building.

Securing the removal of persons who smoke in the building.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 330, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 29-5-163.
Section 29-5-161 not to be construed to permit smoking where otherwise restricted or to prohibit adoption of certain ordinances.

Section 29-5-161 shall not be interpreted or construed to permit smoking where it is otherwise restricted by other applicable laws or to prohibit any municipality or county from adopting additional ordinances with regard to the use of smoking in public places.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 470, § 3 eff from and after July 1, 2006.